Ohio, session 136, HB345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2907.08 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2907.08. (A) No person, for the purpose of sexually arousing or gratifying the person's self, shall commit trespass or otherwise surreptitiously invade the privacy of another, to spy or eavesdrop upon another. (B) No person shall knowingly commit trespass or otherwise secretly or surreptitiously videotape, film, photograph, broadcast, stream, or otherwise record another person, in a place where a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy, for the purpose of viewing the private areas of that person. (C) No person shall knowingly commit trespass or otherwise secretly or surreptitiously videotape, film, photograph, broadcast, stream, or otherwise record a minor, in a place where a person has a reasonable expectation of privacy, for the purpose of viewing the private areas of the minor. (D) No person shall secretly or surreptitiously videotape, film, photograph, or otherwise record another person above, under, or through the clothing being worn by that other person for the purpose of viewing the body of, or the undergarments worn by, that other person. (E)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of voyeurism. (2) A violation of division (A) of this section is a misdemeanor of the third degree. (3) A Except as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (B) of this section is a misdemeanorfelony of the second fifth degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (B), (C), or (D) of this section, a violation of division (B) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. (4) A Except as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (D) of this section is a misdemeanorfelony of the first fifth degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (B), (C), or (D) of this section, a violation of division (D) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. (5) A Except as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (C) of this section is a felony of the fifth fourth degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (B), (C), or (D) of this section, a violation of division (C) of this section is a felony of the third degree. Section 2. That existing section 2907.08 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.